Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.045

Exemption from liability.

Excavators who comply with the requirements of this chapter are not liable for any damages arising from contact or damage to an underground fiber optics facility other than the cost to repair the facility.

[ 1988 c 99 s 2.]